Washington statutes.
RCW 26.19.050

Worksheets and instructions.

(1) The administrative office of the courts shall develop and adopt worksheets and instructions to assist the parties and courts in establishing the appropriate child support level and apportionment of support. The administrative office of the courts shall attempt to the greatest extent possible to make the worksheets and instructions understandable by persons who are not represented by legal counsel.

(2) The administrative office of the courts shall develop and adopt standards for the printing of worksheets and shall establish a process for certifying printed worksheets. The administrator may maintain a register of sources for approved worksheets.

(3) The administrative office of the courts should explore methods to assist pro se parties and judges in the courtroom to calculate support payments through automated software, equipment, or personal assistance.

[ 2005 c 282 s 37; 1990 1st ex.s. c 2 s 5; 1988 c 275 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 26.09.100.

Effective dates—Severability—1988 c 275: See notes following RCW 26.19.001.